Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 25 Narragansett Bay Commission
46-25-55.
Noteholders’ rights not to be affected by state.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any notes issued under this chapter, that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the commission to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders until the notes, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The commission is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of the notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

46-25-56.
Credit of state not pledged.

Notes issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof other than the commission, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision other than the commission, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the commission legally available for that purpose. Each note issued under this chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the state shall not be obligated to pay the note or interest thereon, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof other than the commission is pledged to the payment of the principal or of the interest on the obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 2.

46-25-57.
Sale of rights to uncollected assessments and user fees that are due and payable.

The executive director, with the approval of the chairperson of the commission and the director of the department of administration, is authorized to sell to a bank or other financial institution the rights of the commission to receive assessment and user fees which are due and payable as of the end of the commissioner’s fiscal year and are uncollected at the time of the sale. Terms and conditions of the sale shall be determined by the executive director, with the approval of the chairperson and the director of the department of administration. Any agreement between the commission and a bank or other financial institution, executed under this section, shall be filed with the secretary of state, but need not be filed or recorded under the Uniform Commercial Code. The executive director shall act as the sole collecting agency for the bank or financial institution, and shall exercise the rights under this chapter as to collection, enforcement of liens, and sale for nonpayment with respect to the assessments and user fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 349, § 2.

46-25-58.
Revenue bonds and notes of the commission.

The commission shall have the power and is hereby authorized to issue, from time to time, its negotiable revenue bonds and notes in one or more series in such principal amounts as in the opinion of the commission shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving its purposes, including the payment of interest on revenue bonds and notes of the commission to the extent permitted by law, the establishment of reserves to secure the revenue bonds and notes (including the reserve funds created pursuant to §

46-25-60

), and the making of all other expenditures of the commission incident to and necessary or convenient to carrying out its corporate purposes and powers.

All revenue bonds and notes issued by the commission, may be secured by the full faith and credit of the commission and may be payable solely out of the revenues, earnings, and receipts of the commission or such other property pledged for payment. The revenue bonds and notes may be executed and delivered by the commission at any time, from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such tenor and maturities, and may be in bearer or registered form, as to principal and interest or as to principal alone, all as the commission, in its sole discretion, may determine.

Revenue bonds may be payable in such installments, and at such times not exceeding fifty (50) years from the date thereof, as shall be determined by the commission.

Revenue notes may be payable in such installments and at such times not exceeding ten (10) years from the date of the original issue of such revenue notes, as shall be determined by the commission.

Revenue bonds and notes may be payable at such places, whether within or without the state of Rhode Island, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the commission under which they shall be authorized to be issued.

There may be retained, by provision made in the proceedings under which any revenue bonds or revenue notes of the commission are authorized to be issued, an option to redeem all or any part thereof at such prices and upon such notice, and on such further terms and conditions, as shall be set forth on the record of the proceedings and on the face of the revenue bonds and notes.

Any revenue bonds or revenue notes of the commission may be sold, from time to time, at such prices, at public or private sale, and in such manner as shall be determined by the commission, and the commission shall pay all expenses, premiums, and commissions that it shall deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.

Moneys of the commission, including proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds or revenue notes, and revenues, receipts, and income from any of its sewage treatment facilities, may be invested and reinvested in such obligations, securities, and other investments consistent with this chapter, and to the extent permitted by the general laws of the state of Rhode Island, and/or as shall be specified in the resolutions under which the revenue bonds or revenue notes are authorized.

Issuance by the commission of one or more series of revenue bonds or revenue notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other revenue bonds or revenue notes, but the proceedings whereunder any subsequent revenue bonds or revenue notes may be issued shall recognize and protect a prior pledge or mortgage made for a prior issue of revenue bonds or revenue notes, unless in the proceedings authorizing the prior issue, the right is reserved to issue subsequent revenue bonds or revenue notes on a parity with the prior issue.

The commission is authorized to issue revenue bonds or revenue notes for the purpose of refunding its revenue bonds or revenue notes then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase or maturity, of the revenue bonds or revenue notes, and, if deemed advisable by the commission, for the additional purpose of paying all or part of the cost of acquiring, financing, extending, operating, maintaining, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, developing, planning, or improving any sewage treatment facility. The proceeds of revenue bonds or revenue notes issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding revenue bonds or revenue notes may be applied, in the discretion of the commission, to the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of the outstanding revenue bonds or revenue notes either on their earliest or a subsequent redemption date, and may, pending an application, be placed in escrow. Any escrowed proceeds may be invested and reinvested in obligations of the United States and, to the extent permitted by the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds to be refunded, in obligations guaranteed by the United States, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured or guaranteed by the state of Rhode Island or the United States, or an instrumentality of either, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding revenue bonds or revenue notes to be so refunded. To the extent permitted by applicable laws, the interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on any investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding revenue bonds or revenue notes to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof, may be returned to the commission for its use. The portion of the proceeds of revenue bonds or revenue notes issued for the additional purpose of paying all or part of the cost of acquiring, financing, extending, operating, maintaining, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, developing, planning, or improving any sewage treatment facility, may be invested and reinvested in such obligations, securities, and other investments consistent herewith as shall be specified in the resolutions under which the revenue bonds or revenue notes are authorized, and which shall mature not later than the times when the proceeds will be needed for such purposes. To the extent permitted by applicable laws, the interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments may be applied to the payment of all parts of the costs or may be used by the commission otherwise in furtherance of its purposes.

The members, the chairperson of the commission, the executive director, and other persons executing the revenue bonds or revenue notes shall not be subject to personal liability or accountability by reasons of the issuance thereof.

Revenue bonds or revenue notes may be issued under the provisions of this section without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state of Rhode Island, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this section and by the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or revenue notes or the trust agreement securing the bonds or notes.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the commission shall not issue any bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness without the approval of the division of public utilities as required by §

39-3-15

.

The commission, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then be in force, shall have the power, out of any funds available therefor, to purchase revenue bonds or revenue notes of the commission, which shall thereupon be cancelled, at a price not exceeding:

If the revenue bonds or revenue notes are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment date, or

If the revenue bonds or revenue notes are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the earliest date that the revenue bonds or revenue notes become subject to redemption, plus the interest that would have accrued to such date.

Whether or not the revenue bonds and notes are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of the Rhode Island Uniform Commercial Code, the revenue bonds and notes are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the Rhode Island Uniform Commercial Code.

If a member or officer of the commission whose signature appears on revenue bonds, revenue notes, or coupons shall cease to be a member or officer before the delivery of the revenue bonds or revenue notes, the signature shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the member or officer had remained in office until the delivery.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-59.
Security for revenue bonds or revenue notes.

The principal of and interest on any revenue bonds or revenue notes issued by the commission, may be secured by a pledge of any revenues and receipts of the commission, and may be secured by a mortgage or other instrument covering all or any part of one or more sewage treatment facilities, including all or part of any additions, improvements, extensions to language, or enlargements of such facilities thereafter made.

The resolution under which the revenue bonds or revenue notes are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage, lease, sales agreement, or loan agreement, or other instrument may contain agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the facilities covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents, payments or repayments, or other revenues, therefrom, including moneys received in repayment of loans, and interest thereon, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such rents or other revenues, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the commission shall deem advisable.

Each pledge, agreement, mortgage, or other instrument made for the benefit or security of any of the revenue bonds or revenue notes of the commission shall continue in effect until the principal of and interest on the revenue bonds or revenue notes for the benefit of which the same was made shall have been fully paid, or until provision shall have been made for the payment in the manner provided in the resolutions under which the revenue bonds or revenue notes were authorized.

The commission may provide, in any proceedings under which revenue bonds or revenue notes may be authorized, that any sewage treatment facility or part thereof may be constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, or improved by the commission, or any lessee, vendee, obligor, or any designee of the commission, and may also provide in proceedings for the time and manner of and requisitions for disbursements to be made for the cost of such construction, and for all such certificates and approvals of construction and disbursements as the commission shall deem necessary and provide for in proceedings.

Any resolution under which revenue bonds or revenue notes of the commission are authorized to be issued (and any trust indenture established thereby) may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the commission may determine, including any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the holders of any issue of revenue bonds or revenue notes pursuant to §

46-25-65

, in which event the provisions of §

46-25-65

authorizing the appointment of a trustee by holders of revenue bonds or revenue notes shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-60.
Reserve funds and appropriations.

To assure the continued operation and solvency of the commission for the carrying out of its corporate purposes:

The commission may create and establish one or more special funds (herein referred to as “capital reserve funds”), and may pay into each capital reserve fund:

Proceeds from the sale of revenue notes or revenue bonds, to the extent provided in the resolution or resolutions of the commission authorizing the issuance thereof; and

Any other money that may be made available to the commission for the purpose of the fund from any other source. All money held in a capital reserve fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used solely for the payment of the principal of revenue bonds secured in whole or in part by the fund or of the sinking fund payments hereinafter mentioned with respect to the revenue bonds, the purchase or redemption of the revenue bonds, the payment of interest on the revenue bonds, or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when the revenue bonds are redeemed prior to maturity, provided, that money in the fund shall not be withdrawn therefrom, except for the purpose of making (with respect to revenue bonds secured in whole or in part by the fund) payment when due of principal, interest, redemption premiums, and the sinking fund payments hereinafter mentioned, for the payment of which other money of the commission are not available, if the withdrawal would reduce the amount of the fund to less than the minimum capital reserve requirement established for the fund as hereinafter provided. Any income or interest earned by, or incremental to, any capital reserve fund because of the investment of the funds thereof, may be transferred by the commission to other funds or accounts of the commission if the transfer would not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for such fund.

The commission shall not at any time issue revenue bonds secured in whole or in part by a capital reserve fund if, upon the issuance of the revenue bonds, the amount of the capital reserve fund would be less than the minimum capital reserve required for the fund, unless the commission, at the time of issuance of the revenue bonds, shall deposit in the fund from the proceeds of the revenue bonds so to be issued, or from other sources, an amount that, together with the amount then in the fund, is not less than the minimum capital reserve fund requirement for the fund. For the purpose of this section, the term “minimum capital reserve fund requirement” shall mean, as of any particular date of computation, an amount of money, as provided in the resolution or resolutions of the commission authorizing the revenue bonds or revenue notes with respect to which the fund is established, equal to not more than the greatest of the respective amounts, for the current or any future fiscal year of the commission, of annual debt service on the revenue bonds of the commission secured in whole or in part by the fund, the annual debt service for any fiscal year being the amount of money equal to the sum of:

The interest payable during the fiscal year on all revenue bonds secured in whole or in part by the fund outstanding on the date of computation; plus

The principal amount of all the revenue bonds and revenue bond anticipation notes outstanding on the date of computation that mature during the fiscal year; plus

All amounts specified in any resolution of the commission authorizing the revenue bonds as payable during the fiscal year as a sinking fund payment with respect to any of the revenue bonds that mature after the fiscal year, all calculated on the assumption that the revenue bonds will after the date of computation, cease to be outstanding by reason, but only by reason, of the payment of revenue bonds when due and application in accordance with the resolution authorizing those revenue bonds of all of the sinking fund payments payable at or after the date of computation.

In computing the amount of the capital reserve funds for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of the funds shall be invested, shall be valued as provided in the proceedings under which the revenue bonds are authorized, but in no event shall be valued at a value greater than par.

The commission may create and establish such other fund or funds as may be necessary or desirable for its purposes, including, but not limited to, providing for an insurance reserve fund and a replacement reserve fund.

The commission may by resolution permit the issuance of revenue bonds and notes to carry out the purposes of this chapter without establishing a capital reserve fund pursuant to this section and without complying with the limitations set forth in this section. Revenue bonds and notes issued pursuant to this subsection may be secured by such other funds or methods as the commission may in its discretion determine by resolution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-61.
Trust funds.

All money received pursuant to the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue notes or as revenues, receipts or income, shall be trust funds if such is provided for in the proceedings under which the revenue bonds or revenue notes are authorized. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, money shall be deposited as trustee hereof shall hold and apply the money for the purposes thereof, subject to the applicable provisions of this chapter, the proceedings authorizing the revenue bonds or revenue notes, and the trust agreement securing the revenue bonds or revenue notes, if any.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-62.
Exemption of the commission’s revenue bonds and notes from taxation.

Revenue bonds and notes of the commission, and the income (including gain from sale or exchange) therefrom, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind of the state of Rhode Island and the municipalities and all political subdivisions thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-63.
Revenue notes and bonds as legal investments.

The revenue notes and bonds of the commission are hereby made securities in which all public officers, state agencies, public corporations, and bodies of this state, and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state of Rhode Island, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-64.
Agreement of the state of Rhode Island.

The state of Rhode Island does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any revenue bonds or revenue notes issued under §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-66

, that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the commission to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders until the revenue bonds or revenue notes, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The commission is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of the revenue bonds or revenue notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-65.
Credit of the state of Rhode Island.

Obligations issued under the provisions of §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-66

shall not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the commission, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision, other than the commission, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the commission. Each obligation issued pursuant to §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-66

shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the commission shall not be obligated to pay the obligation or interest thereon except from revenues or assets pledged therefor, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof, other than the commission, is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-66.
Remedies of bondholders and noteholders.

In the event that the commission shall default in the payment of principal of or interest on any revenue bonds or revenue notes, issued pursuant to the provisions of §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-66

, after the bonds or notes shall become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default shall continue for a period of thirty (30) days, or in the event that the commission shall fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or shall default in any agreement made with the holders of an issue of revenue bonds or revenue notes of the commission, the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate principal amount of the revenue bonds or revenue notes of the issue then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the office of the secretary of state and proved or acknowledged in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of the revenue bonds or revenue notes for the purposes herein provided.

The trust may, and upon written request of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate principal amount of the revenue bonds or revenue notes then outstanding shall, in his or her or its own name:

Enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders, including the right to require the commission to collect rent, interest, repayments, and payments on the leases, mortgages, loan agreements, and sales agreements held by it to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the rent, interest repayments, and payments, and to require the commission to carry out any other agreements with the holders of the revenue bonds or revenue notes and to perform its duties under this chapter;

Enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders so as to carry out any contract as to, or pledge of, revenues, and to require the commission to carry out and perform the terms of any contract with the holders of its revenue bonds or revenue notes or its duties under this chapter;

Bring suit upon all or any part of the revenue bonds or revenue notes;

By action or suit, require the commission to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of the revenue bonds or revenue notes;

By action or suit, enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of the revenue bonds or revenue notes;

Declare all the revenue bonds or revenue notes due and payable and, if all defaults shall be made good, then, with the consent of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) of the aggregate principal amount of the revenue bonds or revenue notes then outstanding, to annul the declaration and its consequences.

The trustees shall, in addition to the foregoing have and possess all the powers necessary or appropriate for the exercise of any functions specifically set forth herein or incident to the general representation of bondholders or noteholders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

The superior court of Providence County shall have jurisdiction of any suit, action, or proceeding by the trustee on behalf of bondholders or noteholders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-67.
Other statutes and ordinances.

Nothing herein contained shall restrict or limit the powers of the commission arising under any laws of this state, or any ordinances of any municipality, except if the powers are expressly contrary to the provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall be construed to provide a complete additional alternative method for doing the things authorized hereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and in addition to the powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of all revenue bonds, revenue notes, and other obligations of the commission, under the provisions of §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-66

, need not comply with the requirements of any other statute applicable to the issue of the bonds, notes, and other obligations. No proceedings or notice of approval shall be required for the issuance of any revenue bonds, revenue notes, or other obligations, or any instrument of security therefor except as herein provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-68.
Inconsistent provisions.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or ordinance, general, special or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.

46-25-69.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of the court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 3.